Wisconsin, session 2025, SB375.
do enact as follows:SB375,11Section 1. 346.01 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB375,2,62346.01 (2) In this chapter, notwithstanding s. 340.01 (42), “owner” means, 3with respect to a vehicle that is registered, or is required to be registered, by a lessee 4of the vehicle under ch. 341, the lessee of the vehicle for purposes of vehicle owner 5liability under ss. 346.175, 346.195, 346.205, 346.375, 346.452, 346.457, 346.465, 6346.485, 346.505 (3), 346.575, 346.675, and 346.945.SB375,27Section 2. 346.02 (12) of the statutes is amended to read:SB375,3,48346.02 (12) Applicability to electric scooters and electric personal 9assistive mobility devices. An electric scooter and an electric personal assistive 10mobility device shall be considered a vehicle for purposes of ss. 346.04 to 346.10, 11346.12, 346.13, 346.15, 346.16, 346.18, 346.19, 346.20, 346.215 (3), 346.23 to 12346.28, 346.31 to 346.35, 346.37, 346.38 to 346.40, 346.44, 346.46, 346.47, 346.48, 13346.50 to 346.55, 346.57, 346.59, 346.62, 346.65 (5m), 346.67 to 346.70, 346.78, 1346.80, 346.87, 346.88, 346.90, 346.91, and 346.94 (4), (5), (9), and (10), except those 2provisions which by their express terms apply only to motor vehicles or which by 3their very nature would have no application to electric scooters or electric personal 4assistive mobility devices.SB375,35Section 3. 346.375 of the statutes is created to read:SB375,3,116346.375 Owner’s liability for certain violations related to traffic 7control signals. (1) In this section, “traffic control photographic system” or 8“system” means an electronic system consisting of a photographic, video, or 9electronic camera and a vehicle sensor installed for use with an official traffic 10control signal to automatically produce photographs or video or digital images, 11stamped with the time and date, of vehicles moving through an intersection.SB375,3,1312(2) (a) Subject to sub. (6), a local authority may use a traffic control 13photographic system to detect a motor vehicle doing any of the following:SB375,3,16141. When facing a traffic control signal at an intersection that exhibits a red 15light, including a flashing red light, fully entering the intersection without 16stopping.SB375,3,20172. When facing a traffic control signal at an intersection that exhibits a red 18light, other than a flashing red light, after stopping at the intersection, proceeding 19through the intersection before the traffic control signal exhibits a green light if the 20vehicle is not making a right turn.SB375,3,2321(b) Subject to sub. (5), the owner of a vehicle involved in a violation of par. (a) 22or a local ordinance in conformity with par. (a) that is determined by a system shall 23be liable for the violation as provided in this section.SB375,4,724(3) If a traffic officer or other employee of the local authority prepares a 1uniform traffic citation under s. 345.11 for a violation of this section, the traffic 2officer or employee shall serve the owner of the vehicle with the citation, within 30 3business days after the violation, by personal service or by mailing the citation by 41st class mail addressed to the owner’s last-known address. A traffic officer or 5employee shall send with the citation a duplicate of the photograph, video, or digital 6image, taken by the traffic control photographic system, of the vehicle involved in 7the violation.SB375,4,128(4) Any forfeiture collected under this section shall be deposited into a 9separate segregated account from which moneys shall be used for the costs of 10implementing and operating the system and after those costs have been paid shall 11be administered by the collecting local authority and may be used only for purposes 12of traffic enforcement, traffic safety programs, and traffic safety infrastructure.SB375,4,1413(5) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), it is not a defense to a violation of this 14section that the owner was not in control of the vehicle at the time of the violation.SB375,4,1515(b) All of the following are defenses to a violation of this section:SB375,4,18161. That a report that the vehicle was stolen was made by the owner to a law 17enforcement agency before the violation occurred or within 7 business days after 18the violation occurred.SB375,5,2192. That the vehicle is owned by a lessor of vehicles and is registered in the 20name of the lessor, that at the time of the violation the vehicle was in the possession 21of a lessee, and that the lessor provided a traffic officer or designated employee of 22the local authority with the information required under s. 343.46 (3). In that case, 1the lessee may be charged with a violation of s. 346.37 (1) (c) 1. or an ordinance in 2conformity with s. 346.37 (1) (c) 1.SB375,5,933. That the vehicle is owned by a dealer, as defined in s. 340.01 (11) (intro.), 4but including the persons specified in s. 340.01 (11) (a) to (d), at the time of the 5violation the vehicle was being operated by a person on a trial run, and the dealer 6provided a traffic officer or designated employee of the local authority with the 7name, address, and operator’s license number of the person operating the vehicle. 8In that case, the person operating the vehicle may be charged with a violation of s. 9346.37 (1) (c) 1. or an ordinance in conformity with s. 346.37 (1) (c) 1.SB375,5,1110(6) If a local authority uses a traffic control photographic system, the local 11authority shall do all of the following:SB375,5,1512(a) Place official traffic signs at or reasonably near the jurisdictional limits of 13the local authority on all county trunk highways and state trunk highways under 14the jurisdiction of the local authority informing motorists that intersections in the 15local authority may be monitored by traffic control photographic systems.SB375,5,1916(b) Ensure that any photograph or video or digital image produced by the 17traffic control photographic system is taken from a direction to the rear of the 18vehicles moving through an intersection and be focused on the rear registration 19plate of such vehicles.SB375,5,2220(c) Use traffic control photographic systems only at intersections that are 21identified as having an annual accident rate of 1.0 or greater in studies performed 22by the local authority in the 5 most recent years of high-frequency crash locations.SB375,6,523(7) Nothing in this section prohibits the issuance of a citation to the operator 1of a motor vehicle for a violation of s. 346.37 (1) (c) 1. or a local ordinance in 2conformity with s. 346.37 (1) (c) 1., but a person may not be subject to a forfeiture for 3a violation under this section and a violation of s. 346.37 (1) (c) 1. or a local 4ordinance in conformity with s. 346.37 (1) (c) 1. arising from the same incident or 5occurrence.SB375,6,66(8) (a) This section applies only in a 1st class city.SB375,6,97(b) If a 1st class city uses traffic control photographic systems under this 8section, systems may be used at no more than 5 intersections in an aldermanic 9district.SB375,6,1110(9) Subsection (2) does not apply 5 years after the initial implementation of a 11traffic control photographic system.SB375,412Section 4. 346.43 (1) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB375,6,1613346.43 (1) (b) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2. or 3. or sub. (4), any operator of 14a vehicle violating ss. 346.37 to, 346.38, or 346.39 may be required to forfeit not less 15than $20 nor more than $40 for the first offense and not less than $50 nor more 16than $100 for the 2nd or subsequent conviction within a year.SB375,517Section 5. 346.43 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB375,7,218346.43 (5) A vehicle owner found liable under s. 346.375 is subject to a 19forfeiture of the same amount that may be imposed on a vehicle operator for the 20corresponding violation of s. 346.37 (1) (c) 1. including, if applicable, the doubling of 21the forfeiture as provided in sub. (1) (b) 3. For purposes of this subsection a person’s 22prior violation of s. 346.37 (1) (c) 1. may be counted as a prior violation of s. 346.375. 23Imposition of liability under s. 346.375 shall not result in suspension or revocation 1of a person’s operating privilege under s. 343.30 or 343.31, nor shall it result in 2demerit points being recorded on a person’s driving record under s. 343.32 (2) (a).SB375,63Section 6. 346.575 of the statutes is created to read:SB375,7,84346.575 Owner’s liability for speed restriction violations detected by 5a speed safety camera system. (1) In this section, “speed safety camera system” 6or “system” means an electronic device that uses automated equipment to detect a 7vehicle’s speed and that is designed to obtain a clear visual image of a vehicle’s rear 8license plate.SB375,7,149(2) Notwithstanding s. 349.02 (3) (b) and subject to sub. (6), a local authority 10may use a speed safety camera system to determine compliance with a speed 11restriction established under s. 346.57 or 349.11 on highways under its jurisdiction. 12Subject to sub. (5) (b), the owner of a vehicle involved in a violation of s. 346.57 or a 13local ordinance in conformity with s. 346.57 that is determined by a system shall be 14liable for the violation as provided in this section.SB375,8,215(3) If a traffic officer or other employee of the local authority reviews and 16prepares a uniform traffic citation under s. 345.11 for a violation of this section, the 17officer or employee shall serve the owner of the vehicle with the citation by mailing 18the citation by 1st class mail addressed to the owner’s last-known address within 30 19business days after the violation. A traffic officer or employee shall send with the 20citation a duplicate of a visual image, taken by the speed safety camera system, of 21the rear license plate of the vehicle involved in the violation, the system’s location, 22and the date and time when the violation occurred. No traffic citation may be 23issued for a violation under this section for which the system indicated a speed of 1less than 15 miles per hour above the speed restriction established under s. 346.57 2or 349.11.SB375,8,73(4) Any forfeiture collected under this section shall be deposited into a 4separate segregated account from which moneys shall be used for the costs of 5implementing the system and after those costs have been paid shall be 6administered by the collecting local authority and may be used only for purposes of 7traffic enforcement, traffic safety programs, and traffic safety infrastructure.SB375,8,98(5) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), it is not a defense to a violation of this 9section that the owner was not operating the vehicle at the time of the violation.SB375,8,1010(b) All of the following are defenses to a violation of this section:SB375,8,13111. That a report that the vehicle was stolen was made by the owner to a law 12enforcement agency before the violation occurred or within 7 business days after 13the violation occurred.SB375,8,18142. That the owner of the vehicle provided a traffic officer or employee of the 15local authority with the name and address of the person operating the vehicle at the 16time of the violation and the person so named admits operating the vehicle at the 17time of the violation. In that case, the person operating the vehicle may be charged 18with a violation of s. 346.57 or a local ordinance in conformity with s. 346.57.SB375,9,2193. That the vehicle is owned by a lessor of vehicles and is registered in the 20name of the lessor, that at the time of the violation the vehicle was in the possession 21of a lessee, and that the lessor provided a traffic officer or employee of the local 22authority with the information required under s. 343.46 (3). In that case, the lessee 1may be charged with a violation of s. 346.57 or a local ordinance in conformity with 2s. 346.57.SB375,9,934. That the vehicle is owned by a dealer, as defined in s. 340.01 (11) (intro.), 4but including the persons specified in s. 340.01 (11) (a) to (d), that at the time of the 5violation the vehicle was being operated by a person on a trial run, and that the 6dealer provided a traffic officer or employee of the local authority with the name, 7address, and operator’s license number of the person operating the vehicle. In that 8case, the person operating the vehicle may be charged with a violation of s. 346.57 9or a local ordinance in conformity with s. 346.57.SB375,9,1110(6) (a) If a local authority uses a speed safety camera system, the local 11authority shall do all of the following:SB375,9,17121. Clearly identify the presence of a system by signs stating “Photo Enforced,” 13along with the posted speed limit. The signs shall conform to the manual on the 14uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the department under s. 84.02 15(4) (e), shall be visible to traffic traveling on the highway from the direction of travel 16for which the system is used, and shall be posted at all locations the local authority 17determines are necessary to provide adequate notice of the presence of a system. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb375 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb375 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB375 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB375 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB375: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting